Washington statutes.
RCW 18.165.140

Out-of-state private investigators—Application—Fee—Temporary assignment.

(1) Any person from another state that the director determines has selection, training, and other requirements at least equal to those required by this chapter, and who holds a valid license, registration, identification, or similar card issued by the other state, may apply for a private investigator license card or armed private investigator license card on a form prescribed by the director. Upon receipt of an application fee to be determined by the director, the director shall issue the individual a private investigator license card or armed private investigator license card.

(2) A valid license, registration, identification, or similar card issued by any other state of the United States is valid in this state for a period of ninety days, but only if the licensee is on temporary assignment for the same employer that employs the licensee in the state in which he or she is a permanent resident.

(3) A person from another state on temporary assignment in Washington may not solicit business in this state or represent himself or herself as licensed in this state.

[ 1995 c 277 s 32; 1991 c 328 s 14.]